Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5. Council on the Arts

§ 111.
Purpose of Council.

In order to increase the opportunities for Vermonters and visitors to Vermont to view, enjoy, and participate in the visual and performing arts, a group of people devoted to the practices of architecture, painting, sculpture, photography, music, dance, drama, crafts, literature, and other related arts have formed the Vermont Council on the Arts, Inc. (Council). The Council is a nonprofit organization formed for the purpose of coordinating and encouraging schools, organizations, and individuals in their several artistic and cultural activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 170

, § 1, eff. June 30, 1965; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 49.

§ 112.
Designation as state agency.

The Council is designated as the state agency to formulate and apply for grants-in-aid to the State under the National Arts and Cultural Development Act of 1964, as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 170

, § 2, eff. June 30, 1965; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 50.

§ 113.
Repealed. 2011, No. 139 (Adj. Sess.), § 51(f)(1), eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 114.
Revolving loan fund.

There is established for the Council on the Arts a revolving loan fund of $3,000.00 to enable needy persons and groups to purchase supplies useful in their art or craft.
Funds may be loaned under terms and conditions of repayment as the Council directs, and the Council may adjust or forgive any amount owed to the fund. The Council shall repay all amounts so adjusted or forgiven from its general appropriation.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 74

, § 347.